Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2406
Confidential information, defined.

Confidential information shall mean information made confidential by statute, rule, regulation, or written instructions from the client unless the information is made public or becomes public by the words or conduct of the client to whom the information pertains or from a source other than the licensee.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 6.